District of Columbia statutes.
36-410

Disclosure of information to enforce the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1988 and Pesticide Operations Act of 1978.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the disclosure of accurate and specific information to the Mayor, other District officers or their representatives, private or public sector employees, or the Occupational Safety and Health Commission if necessary to enforce § 32-1101 et seq.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the disclosure of information to the Mayor or other District officers or employees if necessary to enforce Change the Pesticide Operations Act of 1978.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 11, 36 DCR 519

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-510.

References in Text

The “Pesticide Operations Act of 1978,” referred to in subsection (b), is probably a reference to the Pesticide Operation Acy of 1977, D.C. Law 2-70, codified as § 8-401 et seq.